Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.360

Legislative—Initiative—Repeal or amendment—Record.

Upon the adoption of a proposition to repeal or amend an ordinance initiated by petition, the city clerk shall write upon the margin of the record of the ordinance "repealed (or amended) by ordinance No. . . . .," or "repealed (or amended) by vote of the people."

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.360. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]